New York, session 2025-2026, S1551.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 65 of the public service law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 7-a to read as follows: 3 7-a. No utility corporation, municipality or local publicly owned 4 electric or gas corporation shall share, disclose or otherwise make 5 accessible a consumer's electrical or gas consumption data or allow a 6 third party to share, disclose, or otherwise make accessible a consum- 7 er's electrical or gas consumption data, to any police officer, as 8 defined by section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law, or private, 9 local, state or federal law enforcement entity, without a judicial 10 court-ordered subpoena, warrant, or the consumer's written, knowing 11 consent. This subdivision shall not preclude a utility corporation, 12 municipality or local publicly owned electric or gas corporation from 13 using customer aggregate electrical consumption data for analysis, 14 reporting, or program management if all personal identifying information 15 has been removed regarding such individual consumer. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04549-01-5